Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.030

Electronic recording requirement.

(1) Except as otherwise provided by RCW 10.122.050 through 10.122.100, a custodial interrogation, including the giving of any required warning, advice of the rights of the individual being questioned, and the waiver of any rights by the individual, must be recorded electronically in its entirety if the interrogation subject is a juvenile or if the interrogation relates to a felony crime. A custodial interrogation at a jail, police or sheriff's station, holding cell, or correctional or detention facility must be recorded by audio and video means. A custodial interrogation at any other place of detention must be recorded by audio means at minimum.

(2) If a law enforcement officer conducts a custodial interrogation to which subsection (1) of this section applies without electronically recording it in its entirety, the officer shall prepare a written or electronic report explaining the reason for not complying with this section and summarizing the custodial interrogation process and the individual's statements.

(3) A law enforcement officer shall prepare the report required by subsection (2) of this section as soon as practicable after completing the interrogation.

(4) As soon as practicable, a law enforcement officer conducting a custodial interrogation outside a place of detention shall prepare a written or electronic report explaining the decision to interrogate outside a place of detention and summarizing the custodial interrogation process and the individual's statements made outside a place of detention.

(5) This section does not apply to a spontaneous statement made outside the course of a custodial interrogation or a statement made in response to a question asked routinely during the processing of the arrest of an individual.

[ 2021 c 329 s 3.]